New Jersey, session 222, A1397.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Department of the Treasury shall prepare and submit to the Governor and to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), updates to the New Jersey Disparity Study of 2024 no later than January 1 of every fifth year beginning with January 1, 2029.  The updates shall include, but need not be limited to, changes in the availability and utilization of small, minority, women, and service-disabled veteran-owned businesses in State procurement. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.